Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 5.2 The Rhode Island Works Program
40-5.2-30.
Fraudulently obtaining assistance.

Any person who, by any fraudulent device, obtains or attempts to obtain public assistance pursuant to this chapter to which he or she is not entitled, or who willfully fails to report income or resources as provided in this chapter, shall be guilty of larceny and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years and by a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or both, if the value of the public assistance to which he or she is not entitled shall exceed five hundred dollars ($500); or by imprisonment by less than one year or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by both, if the value of the public assistance to which he or she is not entitled shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-31.
Authorization to pay assistance.

Authorization to pay all forms of assistance specified in this chapter shall be made by representatives of the department and the state controller is hereby authorized to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for payments upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the department. Subject to any necessary federal approval, the department is authorized to make payments of cash assistance by check, direct deposit, electronic benefit transfer or other means designated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-32.
Cashing of assistance checks.

For purposes of this section, the term “banking institution” shall mean: (1) Any state or federally chartered bank, savings bank, loan and investment bank, or credit union located within this state; and (2) Any currency-exchange specialist located within this state and enrolled with the department of human services pursuant to regulations to be adopted by the department.

Each banking institution shall cash, at its main office or any of its branch offices within the state, any check drawn by the state and payable within the state to a recipient of cash assistance under this chapter, if the check is negotiated to the banking institution by the original payee of the check, and if the payee produces reasonable identification required by this section and as provided for in regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (d).

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as limiting any rights that the banking institution may have against the payee by contract or law, with regard to items that are negotiated to it as provided for in this section, that are not paid upon presentment or where the payee breaches a warranty made under §

6A-3-417

. This section shall not apply to any check negotiated to a banking institution if the institution has reason to believe that the check will not be paid on presentment or that the tendering party may be in breach of one or more of the warranties contained in §

6A-3-417

.

Provided that a banking institution properly employed the identification procedures prescribed in regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection at the time a cash assistance check was cashed by the institution, the state shall honor and make payment on the cash assistance check and the banking institution shall not be liable to reimburse the state for a loss incurred as a result of the wrongful payment of a check by a banking institution. The director of the department of human services shall adopt regulations specifying: (1) The forms of reasonable identification that a banking institution shall accept when cashing a cash assistance check pursuant to subsection (b); and (2) The identification procedures the institution must employ to receive payment thereon and to avoid liability for wrongful payment of any check. The regulations shall provide that the forms of reasonable identification shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) A cash assistance photo identification card issued by the department of human services; (2) A valid identification card issued by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles pursuant to §

3-8-6

; (3) A valid driver’s license; (4) An identification card issued by the office of healthy aging; and (5) A valid identification card issued by the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service.

The department shall issue a stop-payment order with respect to any assistance check reported as lost, stolen, or undelivered. The department shall not issue a replacement cash assistance check for a period of three (3) business days from the date of the report of the loss, theft, or nondelivery.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-33.
Child clothing allowance.

One month each year, each child who lives in a family receiving cash assistance under this chapter in that month shall be given a supplementary payment of no less than one hundred dollars ($100) for the purchase of clothing in accordance with Title IV-A of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 6, effective July 6, 2021.

40-5.2-34.
Screening for domestic violence — Waiver of program requirements.

The department shall:

Screen and identify individuals with a history of domestic violence applying for or receiving assistance while maintaining the confidentiality of such individuals;

Refer these individuals to counseling and supportive services; and

Waive, pursuant to a determination of good cause and for so long as necessary, cash assistance program requirements relating to time limits for individuals receiving assistance, residency requirements, child support cooperation requirements, and work requirements, in cases where compliance with these requirements would make it more difficult for individuals receiving assistance under this chapter to escape domestic violence or unfairly penalize individuals who are or have been victimized by domestic violence, or individuals who are at risk of further domestic violence.

For purposes of this section, the term “individual with a history of domestic violence” means an individual who has been subjected to:

Physical acts that resulted in, or threatened to result in, physical injury to the individual;

Sexual abuse;

Sexual activity involving a dependent child;

Being forced as the caretaker relative of a dependent child to engage in nonconsensual sexual acts or activities;

Threats of, or attempts at, physical or sexual abuse;

Mental abuse; or

Neglect or deprivation of medical care.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-35.
Child support pass-through.

For any month in which a noncustodial parent makes a child support payment in the month when due and the support is collected by the department of human services, for a child or children receiving cash assistance pursuant to this chapter, the first fifty dollars ($50.00) of the child support payment, or the actual amount of the child support payment if the payment is less than fifty dollars ($50.00), shall be paid to the family in which the child resides. If more than one noncustodial parent makes a child support payment to children living in the same family, there shall only be one payment of fifty ($50.00) paid to the family from the child support collected. This payment is known as the “pass through” payment and shall be sent to the family within two (2) business days of the determination that the amount is due and owing and no later than within two (2) business days of the end of the month in which the support was collected.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-36.
Appropriation of funds.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate sums as it may deem necessary for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of these sums, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of the vouchers approved by the director of the state department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-37.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-38.
Application and effect of this chapter on applicants and recipients.

All provisions of this chapter, with the exception of subsection (b), shall be effective and apply to all applicants and recipients on or after July 1, 2008.

For all current recipients as of July 1, 2008, who have received cash assistance, either state or federally funded, since May 1, 1997, under Rhode Island’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program (federal TANF described at Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), formerly entitled the family independence program, or received cash assistance from another state, either state or federally funded, since May 1, 1997, under that state’s similar Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program (federal TANF described at Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), prior to October 1, 2008, application and implementation of the time limits described in §

40-5.2-10(h)

will occur on and after July 1, 2009.

All cash assistance received, either state or federally funded, since May 1, 1997, under Rhode Island’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program (federal TANF described at Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), formerly entitled the family independence program, or in another state under that state’s similar Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program (federal TANF described at Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.) prior to July 1, 2009, shall be counted toward the time limits of cash assistance described in § 40-5.1-10(h) [repealed].

The department will not close families who previously received cash assistance, either state or federally funded, since May 1, 1997, under Rhode Island’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program (federal TANF described at Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), formerly entitled the family independence program, or in another state under that state’s similar Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program (federal TANF described at Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.) prior to the effective date of the Rhode Island works program due to the time limit outlined in §

40-5.2-10(h)

of this chapter until July 1, 2009. Except, however, all those families who previously received family independence program cash assistance, either state or federally funded or in another state, as described above, and who will reach the family independence program sixty-month (60), lifetime time limit in accordance with prior Rhode Island general law, § 40-5.1-8(d), prior to July 1, 2009, shall be closed at the time they would have reached the sixty-month (60) time limit in accordance with prior Rhode Island general law, § 40-5.1-8(d). Nothing in this section shall be deemed to mean that any recipient of cash assistance, either state or federally funded, through the prior family independence program shall receive more than the time limit of sixty (60) months of cash assistance that had been permissible under prior Rhode Island general law, § 40-5.1-8(d).

Those families or assistance units receiving cash assistance shall be notified in writing as to the time limits imposed on the receipt of cash assistance in accordance with the Rhode Island works program under this chapter, as well as all the other program requirements.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-39.
References to the family independence program.

Any references in the Rhode Island general laws to the family independence act, family independence program, or family independence program cash assistance or benefits shall be deemed to be applicable and shall be effective in accordance with the Rhode Island works program outlined in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.